Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.060

Fee for certification—Disposition.

The fee for any certificate, or any renewal thereof, issued by the authority of the state of Washington, and authorizing the holder to teach or perform other professional duties in the public schools of the state shall be not less than one dollar or such reasonable fee therefor as the Washington professional educator standards board by rule shall deem necessary therefor. The fee must accompany the application and cannot be refunded unless the application is withdrawn before it is finally considered. The educational service district superintendent, or other official authorized to receive such fee, shall within thirty days transmit the same to the treasurer of the county in which the office of the educational service district superintendent is located, to be by him or her placed to the credit of said school district or educational service district: PROVIDED, That if any school district collecting fees for the certification of professional staff does not hold a professional training institute separate from the educational service district then all such moneys shall be placed to the credit of the educational service district.

Such fees shall be used solely for the purpose of precertification professional preparation, program evaluation, professional in-service training programs, and provision of certification services by educational service districts, in accordance with rules of the Washington professional educator standards board herein authorized.

[ 2008 c 107 s 1; 2005 c 497 s 206; 1990 c 33 s 407; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 92 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 17. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 134; 1975 1st ex.s. c 192 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 144; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.70.110; prior: 1965 c 139 s 20; 1909 c 97 p 336 s 3; RRS s 4968; prior: 1897 c 118 s 142. Formerly RCW 28A.70.110, 28.70.110, 28.70.120.]

NOTES:

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 92: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 192: "If any provision of this amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 192 s 3.]

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.